Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.310

Removal of overhanging or obstructing vegetation—Removal, destroying debris.

Any city or town may by general ordinance require the owner of any property therein to remove or destroy all trees, plants, shrubs or vegetation, or parts thereof, which overhang any sidewalk or street or which are growing thereon in such manner as to obstruct or impair the free and full use of the sidewalk or street by the public; and may further so require the owner of any property therein to remove or destroy all grass, weeds, shrubs, bushes, trees or vegetation growing or which has grown and died, and to remove or destroy all debris, upon property owned or occupied by them and which are a fire hazard or a menace to public health, safety or welfare. The ordinance shall require the proceedings therefor to be initiated by a resolution of the governing body of the city or town, adopted after not less than five days' notice to the owner, which shall describe the property involved and the hazardous condition, and require the owner to make such removal or destruction after notice given as required by said ordinance. The ordinance may provide that if such removal or destruction is not made by the owner after notice given as required by the ordinance in any of the above cases, that the city or town will cause the removal or destruction thereof and may also provide that the cost to the city or town shall become a charge against the owner of the property and a lien against the property. Notice of the lien herein authorized shall as nearly as practicable be in substantially the same form, filed with the same officer within the same time and manner, and enforced and foreclosed as is provided by law for liens for labor and materials.

The provisions of this section are supplemental and additional to any other powers granted or held by any city or town on the same or a similar subject.

[ 1969 c 20 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.21.310. Prior: 1949 c 113 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9213-10.]

NOTES:

Weeds, duty of city or town, extermination areas: RCW 17.04.160.